Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2589.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 13, chapter 35, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 13-3508, to read: START_STATUTE13-3508. Unlawful exposure to adult oriented performances; classification; definitions A. A person commits unlawful exposure to an adult oriented performance by intentionally doing any of the following: 1. Allowing a minor under the person's custody or control to view an adult oriented performance. 2. Allowing a minor to enter or remain in a building or part of a building WHERE an adult oriented performance is occurring. 3. Performing or allowing another person under the person's custody or control to perform an adult oriented performance in view of a minor. B. Unlawful exposure to an adult oriented performance is a class 4 felony. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "adult oriented performance" means an in-person show or performance that: (a) Taken as a whole appeals to a prurient interest in sex; and (b) Depicts or simulates specific sexual activities or the lewd exposure of specific anatomical areas. END_STATUTE